District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-342

Mayor to invest or deposit certain funds.

Repealed.

Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-32, § 3, 24 DCR 3725
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-50, § 2, 30 DCR 5916
July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-127, § 2, 39 DCR 3828
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-185, § 2, 39 DCR 8221
June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-134, § 2, 41 DCR 2597
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(a), 44 DCR 6933
1981 Ed., § 47-342.
1973 Ed., § 47-272.
Delegation of authority under Law 5-50, see Mayor’s Order 84-82, May 4,1984.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 9-185, “Public Funds Investment Policy in Financial Institutions and Companies Making Loans to or Doing Business with Northern Ireland Amendment Act of 1992”, see Mayor’s Order 93-76, June 16, 1993.
Companies and their subsidiaries or affiliates doing business in or with the Republic of South Africa or Namibia: See Mayor’s Order 90-115, August 14, 1990 and Mayor’s Order 90-189, November 30, 1990.